Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6337.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4003. (1) This section applies to universal life insurance policies or certificates delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed after December 31, 2027. (2) An insurer of a universal life insurance policy or certificate shall not do any of the following: (a) Cancel insurance coverage for an individual or a family member of an individual based solely on the individual's or family member's genetic information. (b) Request or require an individual to whom the insurer provides life insurance coverage, or an individual who applies for life insurance coverage, to undergo genetic testing, including complete genomic sequencing, as a precondition of coverage or pricing. (c) Access, use, retain, or disclose sensitive medical information, including the genetic data of an individual, without first obtaining the individual's signed, written consent. (3) This section does not prevent an insurer described in subsection (2) from requesting, obtaining, or using existing health information for underwriting, including genetic information contained within an individual's medical record. (4) As used in this section, "genetic information" means information derived from genetic testing to determine the presence or absence of variations or mutations, including carrier status, in an individual's genetic material or genes that are scientifically or medically believed to cause a disease, disorder, or syndrome, or are associated with a statistically increased risk of developing a disease, disorder, or syndrome, that is asymptomatic at the time of testing. The testing does not include either routine physical examinations or chemical, blood, or urine analysis unless conducted purposefully to obtain genetic information or questions regarding family history.